District of Columbia statutes.
24-452

Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, the term “state” means any of the several states of the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam, and the District of Columbia, and the term “Governor” means the chief executive officer of any such jurisdiction.

History

Mar. 12, 1976, D.C. Law 1-51, § 3, 22 DCR 5299

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-252.
1973 Ed., § 24-252.